Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
ARTICLE 126
MEMBERS AND MEMBERSHIPS

Cross references:

For definitions applicable to this article, see §§ 7-90-102 and 7-121-401.

Section

PART 1 ADMISSION OF MEMBERS AND
LIABILITY TO THIRD PARTIES

PART 2 TYPES OF MEMBERSHIPS - MEMBERS'
RIGHTS AND OBLIGATIONS

PART 3 RESIGNATION AND TERMINATION

PART 4 DERIVATIVE SUITS

PART 5 DELEGATES